test/src/morphology/N-pini37_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pini: # Noun (37) pini 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     pini+N+Sg+Nom: pini
     pini+N+Sg+Gen: pini
     pini+N+Sg+Par: pinni
     pini+N+Sg+Ill: pinni
     pini+N+Pl+Gen: pinne
     pini+N+Pl+Par: pinne
     pini+N+Pl+Ill: [pinnehe, pinne]
     pini+N+Pl+All: [pinnele, pinele]
